District of Columbia statutes.
3-1213.01

Appropriations.

(a)

Funds may be appropriated to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(b)

Repealed.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 1301, 33 DCR 729
Mar. 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-88, § 2(k), 50 DCR 10999
Aug. 16, 2008, D.C. Law 17-219, § 7048, 55 DCR 7598
1981 Ed., § 2-3312.1.
D.C. Law 15-88 redesignated the existing section as subsec. (a); and added subsec. (b).
D.C. Law 17-219 repealed subsec. (b), which had read as follows: “(b) All provisions pertaining to marriage and family therapy added by the Marriage and Family Therapy Amendment Act of 2003, effective May 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-88, 50 DCR 10999, shall be subject to the availability of appropriations.”